Hawaii statutes.
§121-39 Pay of
officers and warrant officers while on active duty. Officers and warrant
officers of the army or air national guard while on active duty of the State
shall receive the pay and allowances of officers and warrant officers of
similar grades of the United States Army and Air Force, respectively; provided
that:

(1) The State shall allow
officers and warrant officers to directly deposit their pay by electronic means
to their personal banking accounts; and

(2) No pay or allowances
shall be made to officers or warrant officers for any service for which they
receive military pay and allowances from the United States. [L 1967, c 196, pt
of §1; HRS §121-39; am L 2007, c 31, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next